Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10A-134] Human immunodeficiency virus
and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome screening coverage. (a) Each
policy of accident and health or sickness insurance issued or renewed in this
State, except for policies that only provide coverage for specified diseases or
other limited benefit coverage as described in section 431:10A-102.5, shall
provide coverage for annual screenings for sexually transmitted diseases,
including screenings for human immunodeficiency virus and acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome.

(b) Each accident and health or sickness
insurer shall reimburse all costs associated with the coverage under subsection
(a) to any physician or health care provider complying with this section. [L
2016, c 204, §2]

Note

Applicability of section. L 2016, c 204, §§6, 8.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next